test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-liestaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - liestā: # Noun 32 'eng /est lest/fin' - full paradigm
     liestā+N+Sg+Nom: liestā
     liestā+N+Sg+Gen: liestā
     liestā+N+Sg+Par: liestõ
     liestā+N+Sg+Dat: liestān
     liestā+N+Sg+Ins: liestāks
     liestā+N+Sg+Ill: liestõ
     liestā+N+Sg+Ela: liestāst
     liestā+N+Pl+Nom: liestād
     liestā+N+Pl+Gen: liestād
     liestā+N+Pl+Par: lešti
     liestā+N+Pl+Dat: liestādõn
     liestā+N+Pl+Ins: liestādõks
     liestā+N+Pl+Ill: liestīž
     liestā+N+Pl+Ela: liestīst
